Hawaii statutes.
§46-35 Firefighters, counsel for.
Whenever any firefighter is prosecuted for any crime for acts done in the
performance of the firefighter's duty as a firefighter, or any traffic
violation while in the course of operating any firefighting apparatus or other
authorized emergency vehicle of the fire department, or sued in any civil cause
for acts done in the performance of the firefighter's duty as a firefighter,
the firefighter shall be represented and defended,

(1) In the criminal and traffic violations
proceedings by an attorney to be employed and paid by the council, and

(2) In the civil case by the corporation counsel or
county attorney, as the case may be. [L 1970, c 178, §1; am L 1983, c 124, §15;
gen ch 1985]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next